Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-1929
Fees.

Fees applicable to an applicant for an initial
or renewal license under the Children's Residential Facilities and Placing
Licensure Act include:

(1) A nonrefundable
license fee of twenty-five dollars;

(2) A nonrefundable renewal license fee
of twenty-five dollars;

(3) A reinstatement fee of twenty-five dollars if the license has
lapsed or has been suspended or revoked; and

(4) A duplicate original
license fee of ten dollars when a duplicate is requested.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 6.